Connecticut, session 2026, SB00153.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 17b-261 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
be amended to disregard certain income for a person identified as an
adult disabled child under Title II of the Social Security Act in
accordance with an amendment sponsored by former United States
Representative James Pickle and incorporated into federal Medicaid
law.